Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
467B

SOLICITATION
OF FUNDS FROM THE PUBLIC

Section

467B-1 Definitions

467B-1.5 Professional solicitors; required
disclosures

467B-2 Repealed

467B-2.1 Registration of charitable organizations

467B-2.5 Professional solicitor financial reports;

contribution account

467B-3 Reciprocal agreements

467B-4 Repealed

467B-5 Records to be kept

467B-5.5 Commercial co-venturer's charitable sales
promotions

467B-6 Repealed

467B-6.5 Annual financial reports; fiscal records
and fees

467B-7 Repealed

467B-8 Information filed to become public records

467B-9 Prohibited acts

467B-9.3 Investigations; subpoenas; court orders

467B-9.5 Financial statements

467B-9.6 Enforcement

467B-9.7 Administrative enforcement and penalties

467B-10 Penalties

467B-10.5 Violation as unfair practice

467B-11 Repealed

467B-11.5 Charitable organizations exempted from
registration

and financial disclosure requirements

467B-12 Filing requirements for professional
fundraising

counsel and professional solicitors

467B-12.5 Written contracts; filing with attorney
general

467B-13 Rules

467B-14 Repealed

467B-15 Solicitation of funds for charitable
purposes

special fund

467B‑16 Service of process; substituted
service

467B‑17 Administrative enforcement; cease
and desist orders

Note

Protection of charitable assets; attorney general's
authority, see §28-5.2.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next